Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-214. Fees from localities — Disposition.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center is authorized to charge fees to other governmental units in order to reimburse the center for expenditures made on behalf of the other governmental units.

The fees shall be categorized as either service fees or system enhancement fees.

However, specified portions of a single fee may be divided between such categories.

The service fees are to be deposited into the Crime Information System Fund in the State Treasury as a refund to expenditures.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1975, No. 742 provided that all funds in the Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information Center Fund, as established by Acts 1973, No. 750, should remain in that fund for the continued use of the Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information Center after July 9, 1975.

System enhancement fees shall be restricted in their use and dedicated solely to financing the acquisition, installation, enhancement, and maintenance of equipment required for the center's operation, including any additions, extensions, and improvements thereto.

The center may pledge and use system enhancement fees for the repayment of obligations of the center to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority or other appropriate financing entity.

In addition to other duties as provided, the Arkansas Crime Information Center shall maintain a registry of all orders of protection and temporary orders of protection issued by a court of this state or registered in this state.

(1)Upon receipt of an authorized order of protection, temporary order of protection, or any modification or cancellation of such orders, a court clerk shall immediately forward a copy to the county sheriff of the county for service.

If the county sheriff does not have a center terminal and entries are made by another agency that does have a center terminal, that agency shall make such entries immediately upon receipt of information from the county sheriff.

Only orders which are consistent with § 9-15-302(b) may be entered into the center system.

Information contained in the registry shall be determined by the Supervisory Board for the Arkansas Crime Information Center. Orders of protection and temporary orders of protection required to be entered into the center system shall include, at a minimum, the full name and date of birth of the subject of the order for proper identification.

Information contained in the registry shall be deemed confidential and shall be available at all times only to courts, law enforcement, and prosecuting attorneys.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “budget hearings” for “budget hearings which are held in the fall of each even-numbered year” in (b)(2).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 1, provided:

“Intent.

“(b)It is the responsibility of criminal justice agencies and the courts in the State of Arkansas to ensure that all actions taken are based upon reasons other than the race of the defendant.

“(c)In order to allow the General Assembly to conduct a thorough review of the Arkansas criminal justice process, information on actions taken by criminal justice agencies and the courts must be reported in a timely, uniform, and consistent manner.”

As originally enacted by Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 2, subsection (a) began:

“Beginning July 31, 2003, and,”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “and the Commission on Disparity in Sentencing” following “Legislative Council” in (a).

Information concerning the inmates admitted to and released from the local or regional detention facility, including without limitation:

The state identification number of the inmate;

The offenses the inmates committed or were accused of committing; and

The dates the inmates were both taken into custody and released;

A record of any mental health screening of an inmate administered by a law enforcement agency or healthcare facility.

The results of a mental health screening administered by a law enforcement agency or healthcare facility may be entered into the database as permitted by state or federal law; and

Any other data that that would be of assistance to a law enforcement agency, state agency, legislative committee, academic researcher, or other entity permitted to access the data.

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 350, § 7: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1975 is essential to the operations of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1975 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1975, No. 736, § 3: Apr. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the Seventieth General Assembly that officials of the Arkansas Department of Correction do not have the authority to carry out their responsibilities in regard to death occurring to people under their jurisdiction. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety and to insure the proper administration of justice shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 864, § 24: Apr. 11, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that criminal activity continues to exist in the State of Arkansas, and the law enforcement agencies and the criminal justice system has a need for medical and scientific assistance from a consolidated State Crime Laboratory. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 984, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Apr. 8, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State Medical Examiner should have the authority to remove suitable pituitary glands during the course of an autopsy and donate the same to the Arkansas Dwarf Association for the extraction of hormones needed by dwarfs; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide such authority. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 216, § 3: Feb. 28, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law places a duty on certain persons to notify the sheriff and State Medical Examiner of the death of another by violence or a death under unusual circumstances; that the imposition of a penalty for failure to make such notice is necessary to insure proper reporting; and that this act is immediately necessary to assure that deaths occurring on or after the passage of this act are properly reported. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 644, § 7: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1993, No. 177, § 5: Feb. 19, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that legislation has been proposed for immediate enactment to provide that the State Crime Laboratory shall perform post mortem examinations instead of autopsies; that the present law amended by this act requires whomever performs an autopsy to sign the death certificate; and whereas this law should be changed to post mortem examinations instead of autopsies; and whereas the legislation changing the State Crime Laboratory's duties to make post mortem examinations in lieu of autopsies will go into effect effective as soon as enacted; it is necessary that this act also go into effect as soon as enacted. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 178, § 5: Feb. 19, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State Crime Laboratory is now required to perform autopsies in certain circumstances; that the Crime Laboratory should be required to conduct postmortem examinations in lieu of autopsies; that changing the requirements will grant necessary relief to the Crime Laboratory from its overwhelming workload; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to provide that relief as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, Nos. 1063 and 1246, § 5: Apr. 12, 1993, Apr. 20, 1993, respectively. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the return transportation of bodies for which postmortem examination has been requested and completed is not the function of the State Crime Laboratory, and that such responsibility places an undue hardship on the resources available to the State Crime Laboratory and its personnel. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1151, § 11: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1642, § 7: Apr. 16, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that due to the extraordinary increase in the number of illicit drug laboratory and criminal drug related cases filed throughout the state additional state resources are needed to examine and identify evidence turned over to the State Crime Laboratory; that constructing and equipping regional crime laboratories will provide the most efficient and effective method of meeting these demands; and that the effectiveness of this Act on the date of its passage and approval is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond the date of its passage and approval could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 69, § 2: Feb. 8, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that families of firefighters and police officers, or other persons with a similar eligibility under the two (2) acts specified in subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section who have died as a result of performing emergency services for their communities have not received timely access to awards programs that would assist the families in their time of crisis; and that those families are suffering unnecessarily, because the awards have not been readily available. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 839, § 10: Apr. 3, 2007. Emergency clause provided:“It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the donation of parts of human bodies provides a significant source for protecting the health and safety of the citizens of Arkansas; and that continuous advances in the technology of human transplants and the inherent limitations incident to transplantation from dead bodies require that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 147, § 5: Feb. 7, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current law that generally applies to medical schools only references the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences; that the establishment of additional medical schools in this state requires clarification that these laws apply to any medical schools in this state; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the additional medical schools and their faculty can operate fully and efficiently to protect the well-being of Arkansans. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

There may be sufficient evidence of death, even in the absence of evidence of results of an autopsy or a medical doctor's opinion as to the cause of death. Sims v. State, 258 Ark. 940, 530 S.W.2d 182 (1975).

Cited: Henderson v. State, 279 Ark. 414, 652 S.W.2d 26 (1983).

DNA analysis;

Drug analysis;

Latent fingerprint identification;

Firearms and toolmarks analysis;

Digital evidence analysis; and

Other such areas as the State Crime Laboratory Board deems necessary and appropriate.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1979, No. 864, § 1, provided, in part, that the office of the state medical examiner; the firearms and toolmarks identification, latent fingerprints, and questioned documents examination functions of the Arkansas State Police; and the Drug Analysis Laboratory of the State Health Department were transferred to and merged into the State Crime Laboratory.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 6, provided that the State Crime Laboratory, which was located within the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1), and all its powers, functions, duties, personnel, and funds would be detached from that department and that the State Crime Laboratory would be operated as an independent state agency.

The section further provided that the members of the State Crime Laboratory Board and the officers and personnel of the State Crime Laboratory, including its head, would continue to be appointed in the same manner as then provided by law.

The section further provided that nothing in the act should be construed to reduce any right which an employee of the State Crime Laboratory had under any civil service or merit system.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b).

However, a vacancy may be temporarily filled by the Governor until the Senate shall next meet.

The members appointed by the Governor shall be composed of:

(1)Appointments to the board shall be for a term of seven (7) years.

If, however, the Governor shall not make an appointment by January 15 of the year in which the term expires, that member shall continue to serve until he or she is reappointed or a successor is appointed, and the term of that member shall run for seven (7) years from January 15 in the year the term expired rather than for seven (7) years from the date of actual appointment.

(1)The board shall meet and elect one (1) of its members as chair and one (1) as vice chair.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum to transact the business of the board.

The board shall meet a minimum of one (1) time every three (3) months. Failure of any appointee to attend three (3) consecutive meetings shall constitute cause for removal from the board by the Governor.

Members of the board may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq. The sums shall be paid from the appropriated maintenance and general operations funds of the State Crime Laboratory.

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-12-302, concerning the creation of the State Crime Laboratory Board, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 383, § 1. The former section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 517, § 2; 1979, No. 864, §§ 2-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-1203, 42-1205, 42-1206.

Acts 1991, No. 383, § 1, provided, in part, that the State Crime Laboratory Board created under former §12-12-302 and the State Medical Examiner Commission created under former §12-12-306 are abolished and the terms of their members shall expire on July 15, 1991. Section 1 also provided that the powers and duties of the former State Crime Laboratory Board and the former State Medical Examiner are transferred to a new board created under present §12-12-302 known as the State Crime Laboratory Board.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “to be composed of eight (8) members” at the end of (a)(1); in (a)(2)(A), deleted the first sentence and substituted “The members of the board” for “the remaining seven (7) members of the board”; and substituted “Two (2) physicians” for “One (1) physician” in (b)(6).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “policies and rules” for “policies, rules, and regulations” in (a).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive director” in the section heading; redesignated (a) as (a)(1); in (a)(1), substituted “a director” for “an executive director” and added “and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor”; added (a)(2); substituted “director” for “executive director” in (b) and (c); and made a stylistic change.

Forensic toxicology, including without limitation chemical testing and analysis of body fluids and the performance of procedures to determine the presence and significance of toxic agents both in the investigation of death cases authorized by this subchapter and in other appropriate cases;

Criminalistics, including without limitation chemical testing of trace evidence, physical and microscopic analysis of evidence, latent fingerprint identification and classification, firearms and toolmarks identification, serology, DNA analysis, DNA database administration, and computer forensic analysis;

Drug analysis, including without limitation analyzing and identifying substances suspected as being controlled, illicit, or contraband drugs;

Pathology and biology, including the investigation and determination of the cause and manner of deaths that become subject to the jurisdiction of the State Medical Examiner under § 12-12-318 and the general application of the medical sciences to assist the criminal justice system in the State of Arkansas; and

Any other laboratory divisions, sections, or functions that, in the opinion of the State Crime Laboratory Board, may serve the needs of law enforcement in the State of Arkansas for laboratory analysis.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “including without limitation” for “which shall include, but is not limited to” throughout (b); in (b)(2), deleted “questioned document examination and classification” preceding “latent fingerprint” and substituted “serology, DNA analysis, DNA database administration, and computer forensic analysis” for “and analysis, and, serology”; in (b)(4), substituted “including the investigation and determination” for “which shall include investigating and making a determination”, substituted “under” for “as set out in”, and deleted “shall include” preceding “the general”.

The 2019 amendmentsubstituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in (a).

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-12-306, concerning the State Medical Examiner Commission, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 383, § 1. The former section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 321, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-611, 42-613.

Acts 1991, No. 383, § 1, provided, in part, that the State Crime Laboratory Board created under former §12-12-302 and the State Medical Examiner Commission created under former §12-12-306 are abolished and the terms of their members shall expire on July 15, 1991. Section 1 also provided that the powers and duties of the former State Crime Laboratory Board and the former State Medical Examiner are transferred to a new board created under present §12-12-302 known as the State Crime Laboratory Board.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (a), substituted “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “State Crime Laboratory Board” and added “with the approval of the State Crime Laboratory Board”; and, in (b), substituted “executive director” for “board” and added “and with the approval of the board”.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” and added “and in consultation with the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety”; and substituted “director” for “executive director” in (b).

Be citizens of the United States;

Be physicians or surgeons with a doctor of medicine degree who have been licensed or who are eligible to be licensed to practice medicine in the State of Arkansas;

Have a minimum of three (3) years postgraduate training in human pathology as recognized by the American Medical Association; and

Have had at least one (1) year of experience in medical-legal practice.

The State Medical Examiner shall also be board certified or eligible for board certification as recognized by the American Board of Pathology in Forensic Pathology.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “may” for “is empowered to” and “a medical school in this state accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education or approved by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board to seek accreditation by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education” for “the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Medical Center”; and, in (b), substituted “a medical school’s” for “the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences”, inserted the first occurrence of “or institution”, and substituted “the medical school or institution” for “any such institution or agency”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in (a).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (a); and, in (b), substituted “a medical school’s” for “center” and “the medical school and institute” for “their institution”.

In addition to the duties prescribed in this subchapter, the State Medical Examiner and his or her associates may teach in the medical school, conduct classes for law enforcement officers and officials, lecture, do research, and engage in such activities as shall be deemed appropriate by the State Crime Laboratory Board.

The State Crime Laboratory shall obtain a policy of professional liability insurance in the amount of no less than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to indemnify any person or persons injured by the State Medical Examiner or his or her associates in the performance of their duties under this subchapter.

The premium for the policy of insurance shall be paid from funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the maintenance and general operations of the State Crime Laboratory.

The State Crime Laboratory Board may authorize the Director of the State Crime Laboratory to contract with a medical school in this state accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education or approved by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board to seek accreditation by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, or with other persons or institutions, to obtain services with which to perform the duties set forth in this subchapter.

The participation of a medical school’s faculty or of any other person or institution in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter shall in no way affect tenure or any other status with the medical school or institution.

The State Crime Laboratory shall reimburse the Graduate Institute of Technology and a medical school in this state accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education or approved by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board to seek accreditation by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education for the use of personnel from the institute and the medical school in performing services for the laboratory.

The participation of a medical school’s faculty and institute faculty in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter shall in no way affect their tenure with the medical school and institute.

(1)All law enforcement officers and other state, county, and city officials, as well as private citizens, shall fully cooperate with the staff of the State Crime Laboratory in making any investigation provided for or authorized in this subchapter.

The monthly list shall contain the laboratory case number and will be used by the laboratory for the purpose of returning evidence on which analysis is no longer necessary, thus reducing the backlog of cases found on the evidence shelves at the laboratory.

Nothing in this subchapter shall impair the authority of the prosecuting attorney to require further analysis of evidence in any case having been adjudicated through plea negotiations.

(A)Upon completion of all requested analysis of submitted evidence by the laboratory, the evidence shall be returned to the submitting agency within thirty (30) days.

The submitting agency shall maintain and store evidence until released by a court of competent jurisdiction or the prosecuting attorney.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in (b); and substituted “director” for “executive director” in (c).

Any physician or other person in attendance or present at the death of a person, or any hospital, if death occurs therein and results from such conditions and circumstances as set out in § 12-12-315, shall promptly notify the chief law enforcement official of the county or municipality which shall have jurisdiction and the laboratory of the death and shall assist in making available dead bodies and related evidence as may be requested by the Director of the State Crime Laboratory or his or her staff or by the law enforcement agency conducting the investigation.

Any physician, surgeon, dentist, hospital, or other supplier of healthcare services shall cooperate and make available to the director or his or her staff the records, reports, charts, specimens, or X-rays of the deceased as may be requested where death occurs and an investigation is being conducted under the provisions of this subchapter.

No person, institution, or office in this state which shall make available information or material under this section shall be liable for violating any criminal law of this state, nor shall any person, institution, or office be held liable in tort for compliance with this section.

(1)(A)(i)The records, files, and information kept, obtained, or retained by the State Crime Laboratory under this subchapter are privileged and confidential.

However, the laboratory shall grant access to records pertaining to a defendant's criminal case to the following persons:

The defendant;

The public defender or other attorney of record for the defendant; and

The prosecuting attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction over the criminal case.

The records, files, and information shall not be released to a person or entity other than those listed in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii) of this section except at the direction of a court of competent jurisdiction or the prosecuting attorney having criminal jurisdiction over the case.

In cases in which the cause and manner of death are not criminal in nature, the laboratory may communicate without prior authorization required under subdivision (a)(1)(A)(iii) of this section with the decedent's next of kin or the next of kin's designee, including without limitation:

Parents;

Grandparents;

Siblings;

Spouses;

Adult children; or

Legal guardians.

This section does not diminish the right of a defendant, his or her attorney, or an attorney who has provided a signed release from the defendant to full access to all records pertaining to the case.

Promptly after discovering any evidence in a defendant's case that is kept, obtained, or retained by the laboratory and which tends to negate the guilt of the defendant as to the offense charged or would tend to reduce the defendant's punishment, the prosecuting attorney with jurisdiction over the case shall disclose the existence of the evidence to the defendant or his or her attorney.

The Department of Health may access autopsy records, files, and information under this subchapter for the purpose of implementing the quality improvement provisions of the Trauma System Act, § 20-13-801 et seq., and the rules adopted by the State Board of Health under the Trauma System Act, § 20-13-801 et seq.

However, a full report of the facts developed by the State Medical Examiner or his or her assistants shall be promptly filed with the law enforcement agencies, county coroner, and prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the death occurred.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added “that is kept, obtained, or retained by the laboratory” in (a)(1)(B)(ii); and added (a)(1)(B)(iii).

The 2013 amendment added (a)(1)(A)(iii).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(1)(B)(ii); redesignated former (a)(1)(B)(iii) as (a)(1)(C); deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b); and substituted “the capital offense” for “that offense” in (c).

The 2019 amendmentrewrote (a)(1)(A); and substituted “his or her attorney, or an attorney who has provided a signed release from the defendant” for “or his or her attorney” in (a)(1)(B)(i).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Petitioner failed to show he had a right to copies of a report on latent fingerprint analysis, because indigency alone did not entitle a petitioner to free photocopying, and the petitioner had not fully established that the document that he sought existed or if it did exist, that it was not furnished to his counsel at trial.Hill v. State, 2012 Ark. 309 (2012).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “or civil procedure” in (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the State Crime Laboratory” for “Executive Director of the State Crime Laboratory” in (a).

ALR.

Application of Crawford Confrontation Clause Rule to Autopsy Testimony and Related Documents, 18 A.L.R.7th Art. 6 (2018).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey, Criminal Law, 12 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 617.

The purpose of this section is to remove reports, as described in subdivision (d)(1), from exclusion under the hearsay rule and make them admissible when certain requirements designed to establish their trustworthiness have been met. Hendrix v. State, 40 Ark. App. 52, 842 S.W.2d 443 (1992); Dodson v. State, 326 Ark. 637, 934 S.W.2d 198 (1996).

The purpose of this section is to remove reports from exclusion under the hearsay rule, not to require that they always be admitted for any reason. Echols v. State, 326 Ark. 917, 936 S.W.2d 509 (1996), cert. denied, 520 U.S. 1244, 117 S. Ct. 1853, 137 L. Ed. 2d 1055 (1997).

This section does not apply when the serologist who compiled the report testifies in person. Williams v. State, 322 Ark. 38, 907 S.W.2d 120 (1995).

The prosecution may introduce a drug analysis report through the testimony of a chemist who had not personally performed the test, if the report contains an attestation by the chemist who is purported to have performed the test; there is no notarization requirement. Willis v. State, 309 Ark. 328, 829 S.W.2d 417 (1992).

Hearsay statements contained in a serologist's report were not admissible and the names of suspects listed on the document would not be admitted unless there was some evidence to connect the suspects with the crimes; evidence that a third party may have committed the crime is inadmissible unless it points directly to the guilt of the third party. Echols v. State, 326 Ark. 917, 936 S.W.2d 509 (1996), cert. denied, 520 U.S. 1244, 117 S. Ct. 1853, 137 L. Ed. 2d 1055 (1997).

If a chemist's crime lab report fails to meet the prerequisites of this section, it is considered inadmissible hearsay under Evid. Rule 803(8)(iii); however, even when the state's report meets the statutory requirements and where the state intends to introduce the report as an exception to the hearsay rule, a defendant may, under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, still require the chemist's presence for the purpose of cross-examination, if the defendant requests the chemist's presence at least ten days prior to trial. Lockhart v. State, 314 Ark. 394, 862 S.W.2d 265 (1993).

A facsimile copy of the crime lab report that contained the analyst's attestation, rather than the copy itself, held admissible. Ingram v. State, 48 Ark. App. 105, 891 S.W.2d 805 (1995).

State presented substantial evidence through testimony from a forensic chemist from the state crime laboratory, although he did not perform the lab analysis for a substance obtained from a controlled buy involving defendant, and the lab report indicated that the substance contained methamphetamine, to show that the substance sold by defendant was a controlled substance.Jackson v. State, 2011 Ark. App. 528, 385 S.W.3d 394 (2011).

While the procedural rule requiring pretrial notice of demand for the right of cross-examination of a laboratory employee is generally a reasonable one, there can be no reasonable basis for enforcing such a rule where it is not possible for the accused to comply. Hendrix v. State, 40 Ark. App. 52, 842 S.W.2d 443 (1992).
